District of Columbia statutes.
47-4421

Lien for taxes.

(a)

If a person liable to pay a tax neglects or refuses to pay the tax after demand, the amount, including any interest, addition to tax, or assessable penalty, together with any costs that may accrue, shall be a lien in favor of the District of Columbia upon all property (including rights to property), whether real or personal, belonging to the person, and shall have the same effect as a lien created by judgment. The lien shall attach to all property (including rights to property) belonging to, or acquired by, the person at any time during the period of the lien.

(b)

A disclaimer of a property interest does not invalidate a lien under this section.

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 405(b), 48 DCR 334
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-205, § 4, 53 DCR 9063
This section is referenced in § 42-407, § 47-4422, and § 47-4423.
D.C. Law 16-205, designated existing text as subsec. (a), and added subsec. (b).